Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6608
Home health aide; demonstrate competency; when required.

After January 1, 1989, any home health aide not acting as such for a period of three years shall demonstrate competency in the tasks and duties which are the subject of home health aide training courses. The home health agency shall determine and verify competency of the home health aide in the manner and method prescribed by the department.

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 123.